Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1358
Affirmative Action Office; employees.

The Affirmative Action Office shall consist of such employees as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of sections 81-1355 to 81-1368.

Laws 1979, LB 500, § 4.